Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXII Levees, Drainage, and Reclamation of Lands
CHAPTER 266 Levees

266.010.
Creation of levee district.

In counties of less than 200,000 population, when it will be conducive to the public health, convenience or welfare or when it will be of public benefit or utility, a levee district may be created in accordance with the procedures of KRS

65.182

. KRS

266.010

to

266.180

apply only to levees that have or may receive government aid. All levee districts established prior to 1914 and now existing under the laws of Kentucky are vested with all the powers and rights conferred by KRS

266.010

to

266.180

and are not deprived of any rights previously acquired.

History.

2417c-1, 2417c-23, 2417c-23a, 2417c-25: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 390, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 100, § 25, effective July 13, 1984.

266.020.
Petition to construct levee. [Repealed.]

266.025.
Multi-county levee districts. [Repealed.]

266.030.
Appointment of commissioners for proposed levee. [Repealed.]

266.040.
Duties of commissioners — Report. [Repealed.]

266.050.
Action if commissioners’ report is favorable. [Repealed.]

266.060.
Proceedings if no exceptions are filed. [Repealed.]

266.070.
Proceedings if exceptions are filed. [Repealed.]

266.080.
Appeal from decision establishing or refusing levee. [Repealed.]

266.090.
Order establishing levee — Entry — Conditions. [Repealed.]

266.100.
Board of levee commissioners — Appointment — Terms — Removal of members.

The county judge/executive shall, upon the creation of a levee district as provided in KRS

65.182

and

266.010

and every four (4) years thereafter, appoint five (5) resident landowners of the vicinity of the levee to be known as the board of levee commissioners. The commissioners shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed. The county judge/executive shall fill any vacancies in the board. All appointments to the board shall be subject to the approval of the fiscal court.

Members of the board of levee commissioners may be removed from office as provided by KRS

65.007

.

When a multicounty levee district is established the board shall be appointed by the county judges/executive of the counties involved. Appointments shall be apportioned among the counties in ratio to the portion of the levee to be constructed within each county.

The board of levee commissioners is a body politic, with the status of a corporation, and in its corporate name may do everything authorized by law with reference to public levees.

History.

2417c-8, 2417c-14: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 40, § 4; 1978, ch. 384, § 394, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 18, § 24, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 100, § 26, effective July 13, 1984.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS Chapter 266 authorizes a board of levee commissioners to raise money by three basic methods pursuant to KRS

266.150

,

266.160

and

266.170

and the board is limited to those procedures in its fund raising attempts; any so-called special assessment to be made by the board must conform to the statutorily authorized methods by which a board of levee commissioners may raise and secure funds.

OAG 83-234

.

266.110.
Officers of board — Election — Term — Duties — Bond — Compensation.

The board of levee commissioners shall elect a president from its members for a term of four (4) years, and may prescribe who shall preside in his absence. It may make all necessary rules prescribing the duties of its presiding officer and its own government. The board shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, for a term of four (4) years, or one (1) person to fill both offices. The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of all meetings and perform such other duties as the board prescribes. The treasurer shall receive and keep a distinct account of all money belonging to the board, make payments upon the orders of the board, and perform such other similar duties as the board may prescribe. The treasurer shall, before he begins his duties, execute bond to be approved by the board. The board may fix salaries for its officers and members and provide for the payment of any of its employees.

History.

2417c-15, 2417c-21.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Bonds of officers and fiduciaries, amount and conditions of, KRS

62.060

to

62.080

.

Professional engineer or licensed architect must be employed for certain public works, KRS

322.360

.

266.120.
Duties of board — Power to enforce aid.

The board of levee commissioners shall superintend the construction, care and protection of the levee, and see that convenient crossings of the levee are made at the intersection of all public roads and at such private crossings as the commissioners may establish.

At any time the commissioners deem the levee in danger of being damaged, after being built, by wind or high water, they shall, after giving six (6) hours’ notice to all persons between the ages of eighteen (18) and fifty (50) residing within the territory protected by the levee, require them to assemble at a point designated by the commissioners, and aid in the repair and protection of the levee, for which they shall be paid by the commissioners at the rate of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per day.

No person liable to work under this section shall fail to do so after being notified.

All boards shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

2417c-8, 2417c-9: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 52; 2013, ch. 40, § 75, effective March 21, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Applicability of rule of strict or absolute liability to overflow or escape of water caused by dam failure. 51 A.L.R.3d 965.

266.130.
Board’s power to acquire property.

The board of levee commissioners may enter upon, acquire, take and hold any lands or premises necessary and proper for locating, constructing, reconstructing, enlarging, extending, repairing and maintaining its line of levees, as well as for the cutting of ditches for the purpose of relieving the levees and the lands adjacent thereto enlarged by sipe and rain water. The board may also cut and remove trees, timbers and other materials that may, by falling or otherwise, encumber or endanger any levee. In case the owners cannot agree with the board as to the value of any property taken under authority of this section, the board may condemn the property in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

2417c-16: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 99.

266.140.
Board’s power to cooperate with federal agencies.

The board of levee commissioners may enter into arrangements, contracts and agreements with any river commission or agency of the United States government to secure the construction, reconstruction, repair, enlargement, extension or maintenance of the levee by the river commission or other agency, or with its aid or cooperation. For this purpose the board may turn over to the river commission or other agency the use and control of any part or all of its line of levee, and may place its officers, servants, agencies or funds at the disposal of and under the control and direction of the river commission or other agency, which may take the same in charge and which may contract for and superintend the building of the levee.

History.

2417c-17.

266.150.
Board’s power to tax.

For the purpose of building or repairing its levees the board may levy and have collected an annual tax, not exceeding fifty cents ($0.50) on the one hundred dollars ($100), on all property within the territory protected by the levee. The property shall be assessed and the tax collected in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as in assessing and collecting the county revenue. The proceeds of the tax shall be paid over by the sheriff to the treasurer of the board, and shall be used by the board in the building or repairing of its levees.

This tax shall not be defeated on account of any irregularity in the proceedings that does not affect the substantial rights of the party complaining.

History.

2417c-13, 2417c-22.

266.160.
Board’s power to borrow money and issue bonds.

For the purpose of establishing, constructing, reconstructing, repairing, enlarging, and maintaining the levees the board may borrow money as is necessary, and issue, negotiate, and sell its bonds in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) each, as the board prescribes. The bonds shall each be signed by the president and countersigned by the secretary of the board, with the corporate seal affixed. They shall be made negotiable or nonnegotiable, at the discretion of the board, and shall bear interest at a rate or rates or method of determining rates and be payable annually, at a time and place as the board prescribes and contracts. The board shall fix the place for the payment of principal and interest of the bonds. The bonds shall be redeemable by the board at any time within twenty (20) years after the date of their issue, or at a time within twenty (20) years as is stated in the bonds.

History.

2417c-19: amend. Acts 1996, ch. 274, § 58, effective July 15, 1996.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS Chapter 266 authorizes a board of levee commissioners to raise money by three basic methods pursuant to KRS

266.150

,

266.160

and

266.170

and the board is limited to those procedures in its fund raising attempts; any so-called special assessment to be made by the board must conform to the statutorily authorized methods by which a board of levee commissioners may raise and secure funds.

OAG 83-234

.

Where board of levee commissioners entered agreement for excavation of drainage ditch, under terms of which board was required to acquire the necessary easements and rights-of-way, and board had insufficient funds to acquire such easements, the fiscal court could not levy a special assessment in order to raise funds to enable the board of levee commissioners to purchase the needed land or rights-of-way nor was there any authority for the circuit court to force the fiscal court to levy such a tax; in the absence of sufficient funds, the board could not instigate the condemnation proceedings.

OAG 83-234

.

266.170.
Board’s power to make additional assessments under drainage law procedure.

Whenever it is necessary for the board to have sufficient funds to enable it to pay the interest and principal of any bonds, or any liability incurred necessary in the reconstruction, repair or maintenance of any public levee constructed under laws other than the general laws of the state pertaining to drainage of lands, the board or any landowners benefited by the reconstruction, enlargement, repair or maintenance of the levee may petition the county judge/executive of the county of the board’s appointment to have the lands benefited by the reconstruction, enlargement, repair or maintenance classified and formed into a district and assessed to pay the interest and principal of the bonds or other liability in the same manner as provided in the general laws pertaining to drainage of lands.

A proceeding to have the lands protected by such levee assessed for the repair or maintenance of the levee for the current year shall enable the board to make, annually thereafter, an assessment of a like amount against the land in the district protected by the levee, and, in any year thereafter, an assessment of such a lesser amount as the board considers necessary to repair and maintain the levee. When the cost of the reconstruction and enlargement of the levee cannot be paid out of annual assessments made for the repair or maintenance of the levee, as hereinbefore set out, original proceedings may be had to classify the land benefited by the reconstruction or enlargement and form the land into a district and make assessments against the land so benefited for the cost thereof as often as necessary.

Assessments made under this section shall not be defeated on account of any irregularity in the proceedings that does not affect the substantial rights of the party complaining.

History.

2417c-20, 2417c-22: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 395, effective June 17, 1978.

266.180.
Lien for reconstruction, enlargement, repair or maintenance.

A lien shall exist for the cost of the establishment, construction, reconstruction, repair, enlargement, extension and maintenance of any levee established under the laws of Kentucky against the land within the territory protected by the levee, superior to all other liens except those for taxes due the state, county, municipality or taxing district in which the land is located.

History.

2417c-18.

266.190.
Provisions for levees in any county.

When it will be conducive to the public health, convenience or welfare, or when it will be of public benefit or utility, the county judge/executive of any county may establish and aid in the construction of any levee along a river or watercourse within the county in the manner and subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of KRS

266.100

, KRS

266.120

, subsection (1) of KRS

266.150

, and KRS

266.990

, with the following exceptions:

In KRS

266.120

persons rendering aid in the repair or protection of the levee shall be paid at the rate of one dollar ($1) per day.

In KRS

266.150

the tax collected shall be paid over to the board of levee commissioners.

History.

938a-1 to 938a-9, 938a-13: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 396, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 100, § 27, effective July 13, 1984.

266.200.
Riding on public levee unlawful.

No person shall ride a horse or drive any vehicle on any public levee except at a crossing of a public road or at such private crossings as the board of levee commissioners has established.

History.

938a-10.

266.210.
Hogs, unlawful to permit on public levee.

No person shall permit any hog owned by him to run at large on any public levee.

History.

938a-12.

266.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS

266.120

shall be fined five dollars ($5) for each day the violation continues.

Any person who violates KRS

266.200

shall be fined for each offense not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any person who violates KRS

266.210

shall be fined for each offense not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than ten dollars ($10). Any hog found running at large on the levee may be impounded by the board of levee commissioners and held for five (5) days, and unless within that time the owner pays to the board the above penalty, the board may sell the hog for the benefit of the levee.

The proceeds of all fines collected under this section shall be used by the board of levee commissioners in the building and repairing of its levees.

History.

938a-10, 938a-12, 2417c-9, 2417c-13.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Strays and animals running at large, KRS ch. 259.